Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1280
Official records; certified copies; duty of custodian to furnish; fees.

Every state, county or political subdivision officer having the custody of a public record or writing is bound to give any person on demand a certified copy thereof on payment of the legal fees therefor. Where fees are not otherwise expressly provided by statute, the fee shall be thirty cents per hundred words if the copy is a typewritten copy, and the cost of the mechanically reproduced copy when the copy is made by photographic or offset process. In addition thereto a fee of one dollar shall be charged for the certificate of the officer.

R.S.1867, Code § 409, p. 461;

R.S.1913, § 7973;

C.S.1922, § 8914;

C.S.1929, § 20-1280;

R.S.1943, § 25-1280;

Laws 1957, c. 86, § 1, p. 335;

Laws 1961, c. 454, § 1, p. 1383;

Laws 1977, LB 126, § 1.

Prison physician was not obligated to furnish inmate of penitentiary with copy of hospital record. Rhodes v. Meyer, 225 F.Supp. 80 (D. Neb. 1963).